sv: Form av förbrukningsmaterial för byggnation: Vätska; Pasta; Pulver; Övrigt
hr-HR: Oblik potrošnog građevinskog materijala: Tekućina; Pasta; Prah; Ostalo
sk-SK: Stavebná pomocná forma: Kvapalina; Pasta; Prášok; Iné
es: Forma de consumibles de construcción: Líquido; Pasta; Polvo; Otros
sl-SI: Oblika gradbenega potrošnega materiala: Tekočina; Pasta; Prašek; Drugo
pt-BR: Formulação de consumível para construção: Líquido; Creme; Pó; Outro
bg-BG: Форма за строителен консуматив: Течност; Паста; Прах; Други
ro-RO: Formă consumabil construcții: Lichid; Pastă; Pudră; Altele
pt-PT: Forma de consumível de construção: Líquido; Pasta; Pó; Outro
th: รูปแบบอุปกรณ์ก่อสร้างสิ้นเปลือง: แบบเหลว; เนื้อครีม; แบบผง; อื่นๆ
de: Form des Baumaterials: Flüssig; Paste; Puder; Sonstiges
tr: Sarf malzemesi formu oluşturma: Sıvı; Şekillendirici; Pudra; Diğer
ru: Форма выпуска строительного материала: Жидкость; Паста; Порошок; Другое
pl: Budowanie formy użytkowej: Płyn; Pasta; Proszek; Inne
ja: 建築用消耗品の形態: リキッド; ペースト; パウダー; その他
ko: 건축 소모품 형태: 액상; 페이스트; 가루; 기타
hu: Építéshez használt árucikkek formája: Folyékony; Paszta; Por; Egyéb
da: Byggeforbrugsform: Væske; Puré; Pulver; Andet
el: Μορφή καταναλωτικού υλικού κατασκευής: Υγρό; Πάστα; Σκόνη; Άλλο
vi: Mẫu vật liệu xây dựng: Liquid; Sáp; Bột; Khác
en: Building consumable form: Liquid; Paste; Powder; Other
fi: Rakennuskulutustavaroiden muoto: Nestemäinen; Tahna; Jauhe; Muu
lt-LT: Statybinės medžiagos pavidalas: Skystis; Pasta; Milteliai; Kita
zh-CN: 建筑消耗品形式: 液体; 发蜡; 粉末; 其他
zh-TW: 建築耗材形式: 液態; 膏劑; 粉末; 其他
cs: Forma stavebního spotřebního materiálu: Kapalina; Pasta; Prášek; Jiné
nl: Vorm verbruiksartikelen bouw: Vloeistof; Pasta; Poeder; Andere
it: Formato dei materiali di consumo per costruzioni: Liquido; Pasta; Polvere; Altro
fr: Forme de consommable de construction: Liquide; Pâte; Poudré; Autre
nb: Form av forbruksmateriell for bygg: Væske; Lim; Pulver; Annet